Utah, session 2026, HB452.
Section 1. Section 53-5a-103.6 is enacted to read:53-5a-103.6. Storage of handguns by entities that receive public funds.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Concealed carry permit" means:(i)a concealed carry permit issued under Section 53-5a-303;(ii)a provisional concealed carry permit issued under Section 53-5a-304;(iii)a temporary concealed carry permit issued under Section 53-5a-305; or(iv)a concealed carry permit lawfully issued by or in another state.(b)(i)"Entity that receives public funds" means any private organization, business, or venue that receives $1,000,000 or more in public funds through an appropriation, grant, contract, or other authorized expenditure.(ii)"Entity that receives public funds" does not include a private organization, business, or venue that receives public funds under a contract with the state or a political subdivision of the state to provide a direct service that is performed for the benefit of the state or political subdivision of the state in exchange for payment.(c)"Public funds" means money that is provided by the state or a political subdivision of the state.(2)(a)An entity that receives public funds shall comply with the requirements of Subsection (2)(b) if the entity does not allow individuals to carry firearms on property that:(i)is owned, leased, or operated by the entity:(A)within the jurisdictional boundaries of the district created under Title 11, Chapter 70, Utah Fairpark Area Investment and Restoration District;(B)that is included in a zone created under Title 63N, Chapter 3, Part 6, Housing and Transit Reinvestment Zone Act; or(C)that is included in a zone created under Title 63N, Chapter 3, Part 14, Capital City Revitalization Zone; and(ii)is open to the public, regardless of whether an admission fee is charged or a ticket is required for entry.(b)An entity described in Subsection (2)(a):(i)shall provide a secure storage area for an individual to store the individual's handgun while the individual is on the property if the individual has a concealed carry permit;(ii)is responsible for the handguns while the handguns are stored in the secure storage area; and(iii)may not charge a fee to store the handguns in the secure storage area.(c)An entity that receives public funds may locate the secure storage area described in Subsection (2)(b) at a nearby location to the property described in Subsection (2)(a) if the property cannot accommodate a secure storage area.(3)(a)If an individual stores a handgun with an entity that receives public funds under Subsection (2)(b)(i) and does not return within 24 hours from the time the individual stored the handgun with the entity, the entity shall notify the local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the property and request that the local law enforcement agency take possession of the handgun.(b)A local law enforcement agency that receives a request under Subsection (3)(a):(i)shall take possession of the handgun described in Subsection (3)(a) within five business days from the day on which the law enforcement agency receives the request; and(ii)may dispose of the handgun in accordance with Section 77-11d-105.(4)(a)An entity that receives public funds may establish a process to verify that an individual who seeks to store a handgun in accordance with Subsection (2) holds a valid concealed carry permit which may include:(i)reviewing the individual's concealed carry permit; and(ii)if the concealed carry permit is a permit issued under Section 53-5a-303, 53-5a-304, or 53-5a-305, entering the concealed carry permit number into the online verification system created by the bureau under Subsection 53-5a-603(2)(a).(b)After completing a verification of a concealed carry permit under Subsection (4)(a), an entity that receives public funds may not retain any information obtained under Subsection (4)(a) except as necessary to comply with an applicable court order.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53-5a-603 is amended to read:53-5a-603. Information check before private sale of firearm -- Validation of concealed carry permit.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Governmental entity" means the state and the state's political subdivisions.(b)"Law enforcement agency" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-1-102.(c)"Personally identifiable information" means the same as that term is defined in Section 63D-2-102.(2)Subject to Subsections (3) and (4), the bureau shall create an online process that allows an individual who is selling or purchasing a firearm to voluntarily determine:(a)if the other individual involved in the sale of the firearm has a valid concealed carry permit issued under Section 53-5a-303, a provisional concealed carry permit issued under Section 53-5a-304, or a temporary concealed carry permit issued under Section 53-5a-305; or(b)based on the serial number of the firearm, if the firearm is reported as stolen.(3)Subsection (2) does not apply to a federal firearms licensee or dealer.(4)The bureau may not:(a)provide information related to a request under Subsection (2) to a law enforcement agency; or(b)collect a user's personally identifiable information under Subsection (2).(5)A governmental entity may not require an individual who is selling or purchasing a firearm to use the process under Subsection (2).(6)If an individual uses the process under Subsection (2), the individual is not required, based on the information the individual receives from the bureau, to make a report to a law enforcement agency.(7)After responding to a request under Subsection (2), the bureau shall immediately dispose of all information related to the request.(8)(a)This section does not create a civil cause of action arising from the sale or purchase of a firearm under this section.(b)An individual's failure to use the process under Subsection (2) is not evidence of the individual's negligence in a civil cause of action.(9)An entity receiving public funds may use the process described in Subsection (2)(a) to validate a concealed carry permit as described in Subsection 53-5a-103.6(4).

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.